Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Chapter 15. Release of Powers of Appointment

§ 91-15-1.
Citation of chapter.

This chapter may be cited as the “release of power of appointment law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 671-71; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 1.

§ 91-15-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Power” includes any power to appoint or designate to whom property shall go, any power to invade property, any power to alter, amend, or revoke any instrument under which an estate or trust is held or created or to terminate any right or interest thereunder, and any power remaining where one or more partial releases have heretofore or hereafter been made with respect to a power, whether heretofore or hereafter created or reserved, whether vested, contingent, or conditional, and whether classified in law or known as a power in gross, a power appendant, a power appurtenant, a collateral power, a general, special, or limited power, exclusive or nonexclusive power, or otherwise, and irrespective of when, in what manner, or in whose favor it may be exercised.

“Donee” means any person, whether resident or nonresident of this state, who, either alone or with another, has the right to exercise a power.

“Objects” when used in connection with a power means the person in whose favor the power may be exercised.

“Property” when used in connection with a power means any and all property, whether real or personal, any and all interest in property, and any and all income from property, which is subject to the power, and includes any part of the property, any part of the interest in property, and any part of the income from property.

“Release” means renunciation, relinquishment, surrender, refusal to accept, extinguishment, and any other form of release.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-72; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 2.

§ 91-15-5.
Right to release.

Unless the instrument creating the power specifically provides to the contrary, the donee of a power, whether now existing or hereafter created, may:

At any time completely release his power.

At any time or times release his power: (one) as to any property which is subject thereto; (two) as to any one or more of the objects thereof; or (three) so as to limit in any other respect the extent to which it may be exercised.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-73; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 3.

§ 91-15-7.
Manner of effecting release.

A release of a power, whether partial or complete, shall be valid and effective with or without a consideration when the donee executes an instrument evidencing an intent to make the release, signed and acknowledged in the manner prescribed for the execution of deeds, and delivers the instrument or causes it to be delivered, either:

To an adult person who may take any of the property which is subject to the power in the event of its non-exercise, or to one in whose favor it may be exercised after such partial release; or

To any trustee or any co-trustee of the property which is subject to the power; or

By filing the same for recordation in the chancery clerk’s office in the county and judicial district thereof in which any of the property is located, or in which either the donee or the trustee in control of the property resides, or in which the trustee has its principal office, or in which the instrument creating the power is probated or recorded.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-74; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 4.

§ 91-15-9.
Release heretofore made.

A release of a power executed prior to April 10, 1946, shall have the same effect as if this chapter had been in effect at the time the release was executed and delivered.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-75; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 5.

§ 91-15-11.
Right of release not exclusive.

The rights and means provided in this chapter for the release of a power are not exclusive, but are in addition to all other rights and means of a donee to release a power in whole or in part.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-76; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 6.

§ 91-15-13.
Delivery of release as notice.

Any fiduciary or other person, association, or corporation having the possession or control of any property subject to a power of appointment shall be deemed to have notice of a release of the power when the original or a copy of the release is delivered to such fiduciary or other person, association, or corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-77; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 7.

§ 91-15-15.
Recordation as notice.

Any purchaser or mortgagee of real property subject to a power of appointment, who is without actual notice, shall be deemed to have notice of a release of the power when the original or duplicate original is filed for record in the chancery clerk’s office in the county and judicial district thereof in which the particular real property so purchased or mortgaged is located, and when the deed, will, or other instrument creating the power, or a duly attested copy thereof, is recorded in the same office, and an appropriate notation is entered on the margin of the will or deed book where the instrument creating the power is recorded, referring to the deed book and page where the release is recorded.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-78; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 8.

§ 91-15-17.
Manner of recording release.

Clerks of chancery courts are authorized and directed to record releases of powers of appointment in the books provided for the recordation of deeds, to index the same in the current and general indexes, the name of the donee being entered on the grantor index, and to charge therefor at the rate applicable to deeds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-79; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 9.

§ 91-15-19.
Release not invalid for failure to comply with certain sections.

No release shall be invalid or ineffective because of failure to comply with either Section 91-15-13 or Section 91-15-15.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-80; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 10.

§ 91-15-21.
Controlling effect of chapter.

In so far as the provisions of this chapter may conflict with other laws or parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-81; Laws, 1946, ch. 405, § 11.